test/src/morphology/all-pos-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - gåetie: # -ie stem, root vowel -åe-
    gåetie+N+Sg+Nom: gåetie
    gåetie+N+Sg+Acc: gåetiem
    gåetie+N+Sg+Gen: gåetien
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ill: gåatan
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ine: gåetesne
    gåetie+N+Sg+Ela: gåeteste
    gåetie+N+Sg+Com: [gåetine, göötine]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Nom: gåetieh
    gåetie+N+Pl+Acc: [gåetide, göötide]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Gen: [gåetiej, gööti]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ill: [gåetide, göötide]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ine: [gåetine, göötine]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Ela: [gåetijste, göötijste]
    gåetie+N+Pl+Com: [gåetiejgujmie, göötigujmie]
    gåetie+N+Ess: [gåetine, göötine]

  Noun - gåata: # -a stem, root vowel -åa-
    gåata+N+Sg+Nom: gåata
    gåata+N+Sg+Acc: gåatam
    gåata+N+Sg+Gen: gåatan
    gåata+N+Sg+Ill: gåatese
    gåata+N+Sg+Ine: gåatesne
    gåata+N+Sg+Ela: gåateste
    gåata+N+Sg+Com: gåatine
    gåata+N+Pl+Nom: gåatah
    gåata+N+Pl+Acc: gåatide
    gåata+N+Pl+Gen: gåataj
    gåata+N+Pl+Ill: gåatide
    gåata+N+Pl+Ine: gåatine
    gåata+N+Pl+Ela: gåatijste
    gåata+N+Pl+Com: gåatajgujmie
    gåata+N+Ess: gåatine

  Noun - maana: # -a stem, root vowel -aa-
    maana+N+Sg+Nom: maana
    maana+N+Sg+Acc: maanam
    maana+N+Sg+Gen: maanan
    maana+N+Sg+Ill: maanese
    maana+N+Sg+Ine: maanesne
    maana+N+Sg+Ela: maaneste
    maana+N+Sg+Com: maanine
    maana+N+Pl+Nom: maanah
    maana+N+Pl+Acc: maanide
    maana+N+Pl+Gen: maanaj
    maana+N+Pl+Ill: maanide
    maana+N+Pl+Ine: maanine
    maana+N+Pl+Ela: maanijste
    maana+N+Pl+Com: maanajgujmie
    maana+N+Ess: maanine

  Noun - gærja: # -a stem, root vowel -a-, full Px infl, all clitics
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom: gærja
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gan: gærjagan
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/ge: gærjage
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gih: gærjagih
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gænnah: gærjagænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: gærjeme
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/gan: gærjemegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/ge: gærjemege
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/gih: gærjemegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: gærjemegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: gærjedh
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/gan: gærjedhgan
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/ge: gærjedhge
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/gih: gærjedhgih
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Foc/gænnah: gærjedhgænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: gærjese
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/gan: gærjesegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/ge: gærjesege
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/gih: gærjesegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Foc/gænnah: gærjesegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc: gærjam
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/gan: gærjamgan
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/ge: gærjamge
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/gih: gærjamgih
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+Foc/gænnah: gærjamgænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [gærjeme, gærjemem]
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/gan: [gærjememgan, gærjemegan]
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/ge: [gærjememge, gærjemege]
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/gih: [gærjememgih, gærjemegih]
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: [gærjememgænnah, gærjemegænnah]
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: gærjemdh
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/gan: gærjemdhgan
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/ge: gærjemdhge
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/gih: gærjemdhgih
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Foc/gænnah: gærjemdhgænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: gærjemse
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/gan: gærjemsegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/ge: gærjemsege
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/gih: gærjemsegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Foc/gænnah: gærjemsegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen: gærjan
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gan: gærjangan
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/ge: gærjange
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gih: gærjangih
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+Foc/gænnah: gærjangænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: gærjene
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/gan: gærjenegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/ge: gærjenege
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/gih: gærjenegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: gærjenegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill: gærjese
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gan: gærjesegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/ge: gærjesege
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gih: gærjesegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+Foc/gænnah: gærjesegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: gærjasanne
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/gan: gærjasannegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/ge: gærjasannege
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/gih: gærjasannegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: gærjasannegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: gærjasadth
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/gan: gærjasadthgan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/ge: gærjasadthge
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/gih: gærjasadthgih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Foc/gænnah: gærjasadthgænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ine: gærjesne
    gærja+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gan: gærjesnegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/ge: gærjesnege
    gærja+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gih: gærjesnegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ine+Foc/gænnah: gærjesnegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela: gærjeste
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gan: gærjestegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/ge: gærjestege
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gih: gærjestegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+Foc/gænnah: gærjestegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: gærjastadth
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: gærjastanne
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: [gærjastanne, gærjastadth]
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gan: gærjastadthgan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gan: gærjastannegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gan: [gærjastannegan, gærjastadthgan]
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ge: gærjastadthge
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ge: gærjastannege
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/ge: [gærjastannege, gærjastadthge]
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gih: gærjastadthgih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gih: gærjastannegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gih: [gærjastannegih, gærjastadthgih]
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: gærjastadthgænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: gærjastannegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Foc/gænnah: [gærjastannegænnah, gærjastadthgænnah]
    gærja+N+Sg+Com: gærjine
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gan: gærjinegan
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+Foc/ge: gærjinege
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gih: gærjinegih
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+Foc/gænnah: gærjinegænnah
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: gærjanadth
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/gan: gærjanadthgan
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/ge: gærjanadthge
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/gih: gærjanadthgih
    gærja+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2+Foc/gænnah: gærjanadthgænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Nom: gærjah
    gærja+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gan: gærjahgan
    gærja+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/ge: gærjahge
    gærja+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gih: gærjahgih
    gærja+N+Pl+Nom+Foc/gænnah: gærjahgænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Acc: gærjide
    gærja+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/gan: gærjidegan
    gærja+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/ge: gærjidege
    gærja+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/gih: gærjidegih
    gærja+N+Pl+Acc+Foc/gænnah: gærjidegænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Gen: gærjaj
    gærja+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gan: gærjajgan
    gærja+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/ge: gærjajge
    gærja+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gih: gærjajgih
    gærja+N+Pl+Gen+Foc/gænnah: gærjajgænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Ill: gærjide
    gærja+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gan: gærjidegan
    gærja+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/ge: gærjidege
    gærja+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gih: gærjidegih
    gærja+N+Pl+Ill+Foc/gænnah: gærjidegænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Ine: gærjine
    gærja+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gan: gærjinegan
    gærja+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/ge: gærjinege
    gærja+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gih: gærjinegih
    gærja+N+Pl+Ine+Foc/gænnah: gærjinegænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Ela: gærjijste
    gærja+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gan: gærjijstegan
    gærja+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/ge: gærjijstege
    gærja+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gih: gærjijstegih
    gærja+N+Pl+Ela+Foc/gænnah: gærjijstegænnah
    gærja+N+Pl+Com: gærjajgujmie
    gærja+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gan: gærjajgujmiegan
    gærja+N+Pl+Com+Foc/ge: gærjajgujmiege
    gærja+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gih: gærjajgujmiegih
    gærja+N+Pl+Com+Foc/gænnah: gærjajgujmiegænnah
    gærja+N+Ess: gærjine
    gærja+N+Ess+Foc/gan: gærjinegan
    gærja+N+Ess+Foc/ge: gærjinege
    gærja+N+Ess+Foc/gih: gærjinegih
    gærja+N+Ess+Foc/gænnah: gærjinegænnah

  Noun - bearkoe: # -oe stem, root vowel -ea-
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Nom: bearkoe
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Acc: bearkoem
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Gen: bearkoen
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Ill: [byörkese, bearkose]
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Ine: bearkosne
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Ela: bearkoste
    bearkoe+N+Sg+Com: bearkojne
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Nom: bearkoeh
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Acc: bearkojde
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Gen: bearkoej
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Ill: bearkojde
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Ine: bearkojne
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Ela: bearkojste
    bearkoe+N+Pl+Com: bearkoejgujmie
    bearkoe+N+Ess: bearkojne

  Noun - nïejte: # -e stem, root vowel -ïe-
    nïejte+N+Sg+Nom: nïejte
    nïejte+N+Sg+Acc: nïejtem
    nïejte+N+Sg+Gen: nïejten
    nïejte+N+Sg+Ill: nïejtese
    nïejte+N+Sg+Ine: nïejtesne
    nïejte+N+Sg+Ela: nïejteste
    nïejte+N+Sg+Com: nïejtine
    nïejte+N+Pl+Nom: [nïejth, nïejteh]
    nïejte+N+Pl+Acc: nïejtide
    nïejte+N+Pl+Gen: nïejti
    nïejte+N+Pl+Ill: nïejtide
    nïejte+N+Pl+Ine: nïejtine
    nïejte+N+Pl+Ela: nïejtijste
    nïejte+N+Pl+Com: nïejtigujmie
    nïejte+N+Ess: nïejtine

  Noun - gierehtse: # -uneven noun, stem vowel -ie-
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Nom: gierehtse
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Acc: gierehtsem
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Gen: gierehtsen
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Ill: gieriehtsasse
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Ine: gieriehtsisnie
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Ela: gieriehtsistie
    gierehtse+N+Sg+Com: gieriehtsinie
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Nom: gierehtsh
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Acc: gieriehtsidie
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Gen: gierehtsi
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Ill: gieriehtsidie
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Ine: gieriehtsinie
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Ela: gieriehtsijstie
    gierehtse+N+Pl+Com: gierehtsigujmie
    gierehtse+N+Ess: gieriehtsinie

  Noun - daktere: # -uneven noun, stem vowel -a-
    daktere+N+Sg+Nom: daktere
    daktere+N+Sg+Acc: dakterem
    daktere+N+Sg+Gen: dakteren
    daktere+N+Sg+Ill: daktarasse
    daktere+N+Sg+Ine: daktarisnie
    daktere+N+Sg+Ela: daktaristie
    daktere+N+Sg+Com: daktarinie
    daktere+N+Pl+Nom: dakterh
    daktere+N+Pl+Acc: daktaridie
    daktere+N+Pl+Gen: dakteri
    daktere+N+Pl+Ill: daktaridie
    daktere+N+Pl+Ine: daktarinie
    daktere+N+Pl+Ela: daktarijstie
    daktere+N+Pl+Com: dakterigujmie
    daktere+N+Ess: daktarinie

  Noun - gåatetje: # Dimin-derivation
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gåatetje
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc: gåatetjem
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: gåatetjen
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill: gåatatjasse
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ine: gåatatjisnie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ela: gåatatjistie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com: gåatatjinie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: gåatetjh
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc: gåatatjidie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen: gåatetji
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill: gåatatjidie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ine: gåatatjinie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ela: gåatatjijstie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com: gåatetjigujmie
    gåetie+N+Der/Dimin+N+Ess: gåatatjinie

  Acro - FOX: # ACRO inflection test
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Nom: FOX
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Acc: FOX:m
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Gen: FOX:n
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Ill: FOX:se
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Ine: FOX:sne
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Ela: FOX:ste
    FOX+N+ACR+Sg+Com: FOX:ine
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Nom: FOX:h
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Acc: FOX:ide
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Gen: FOX:j
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Ill: FOX:ide
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Ine: FOX:ine
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Ela: FOX:jste
    FOX+N+ACR+Pl+Com: FOX:jgujmie
    FOX+N+ACR+Ess: FOX:ine

  Num - 44:
    44+Num+Sg+Nom: '44'
    44+Num+Sg+Acc: 44:m
    44+Num+Sg+Gen: 44:n
    44+Num+Sg+Ill: 44:se
    44+Num+Sg+Ine: 44:sne
    44+Num+Sg+Ela: 44:ste
    44+Num+Sg+Com: 44:ine
    44+Num+Pl+Nom: 44:h
    44+Num+Pl+Acc: 44:ide
    44+Num+Pl+Gen: 44:j
    44+Num+Pl+Ill: 44:ide
    44+Num+Pl+Ine: 44:ine
    44+Num+Pl+Ela: 44:jste
    44+Num+Pl+Com: 44:jgujmie
    44+Num+Ess: 44:ine
